California, session 20252026, AB2695.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 910.1 of the Public Utilities Code is amended to read:910.1. (a) The commission shall annually biannually submit a report to the Legislature on the commission’s timeliness in resolving cases, information on the disposition of applications for rehearings, and the days that commissioners presided in and attended hearings. The report shall include the number of scoping memos issued in each proceeding and the number of orders issued extending the statutory deadlines pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 1701.2, for all adjudication cases, and pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1701.5, for all ratesetting or quasi-legislative cases.(b) For reporting on commissioner attendance at hearings, the report shall include reporting based on attendance at all types of hearings, including by all of the following:(1) Hearing type, including, but not limited to, prehearing conferences, evidentiary hearings, public participation hearings, and workshops.(2) Proceeding type, including quasi-legislative, an adjudication, a rate-setting, or a catastrophic wildfire proceeding.(3) Industry type, including electric, electrical, gas, water, telecommunications, or transportation.